Hawaii statutes.
§707-751 Promoting child abuse in the
second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting child abuse
in the second degree if, knowing or having reason to know its character and
content, the person:

(a) Disseminates child pornography;

(b) Reproduces child pornography with intent to
disseminate;

(c) Disseminates any book, magazine, periodical,
film, videotape, computer disk, or any other material that contains an image of
child pornography;

(d) Disseminates any pornographic material which employs,
uses, or otherwise contains a minor engaging in or assisting others to engage
in sexual conduct; or

(e) Possesses thirty or more images of any form of
child pornography, and the content of at least one image contains one or more
of the following:

(i) A minor who is younger than the age of
twelve;

(ii) Sadomasochistic abuse of a minor; or

(iii) Bestiality involving a minor.

(2) As used in this section:

"Child pornography" means any
pornographic visual representation, including any photograph, film, video,
picture, or computer or computer-generated image or picture, whether made or
produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means, of sexual conduct, if:

(a) The pornographic production of such visual
representation involves the use of a minor engaging in sexual conduct; or

(b) The pornographic visual representation has been
created, adapted, or modified to appear that an identifiable minor is engaging
in sexual conduct.

"Community standards" means the
standards of the State.

"Computer" shall have the same
meaning as in section 708-890.

"Disseminate" means to publish, sell,
distribute, transmit, exhibit, present material, mail, ship, or transport by
any means, including by computer, or to offer or agree to do the same.

"Lascivious" means tending to incite
lust, to deprave the morals in respect to sexual relations, or to produce
voluptuous or lewd emotions in the average person, applying contemporary
community standards.

"Material" means any printed matter,
visual representation, or sound recording and includes, but is not limited to,
books, magazines, motion picture films, pamphlets, newspapers, pictures,
photographs, and tape or wire recordings.

"Minor" means any person less than
eighteen years old.

"Pornographic" shall have the same
meaning as in section 712-1210.

"Sadomasochistic abuse" means
flagellation or torture by or upon a person as an act of sexual stimulation or
gratification.

"Sexual conduct" means actual or
simulated sexual intercourse, including genital-genital contact, oral-genital
contact, anal-genital contact, or oral-anal contact, whether between persons of
the same or opposite sex, masturbation, bestiality, sexual penetration, deviate
sexual intercourse, sadomasochistic abuse, or lascivious exhibition of the
genital or pubic area of a minor.

"Visual representation" refers to,
but is not limited to, undeveloped film and videotape, and data stored on
computer disk or by electronic means that are capable of conversion into a
visual image.

(3) The fact that a person engaged in the
conduct specified by this section is prima facie evidence that the person
engaged in that conduct with knowledge of the character and content of the
material. The fact that the person who was employed, used, or otherwise
contained in the pornographic material was at that time, a minor, is prima
facie evidence that the defendant knew the person to be a minor.

(4) Promoting child abuse in the second degree
is a class B felony. [L 1978, c 214, §2; am L 1982, c 218, §2; am L 1986, c
314, §59; am L 1997, c 363, §2; am L 2002, c 200, §3; am L 2012, c 212, §1; am
L 2016, c 16, §2]

Cross References

Reporting on child abuse, see chapter 350.

Promoting pornography, see §712-1214.

Law Journals and Reviews

State v. Kam: The Constitutional Status of Obscenity in
Hawaii. 11 UH L. Rev. 253 (1989).

The Jurisdictional Limits of Federal Criminal Child
Pornography Law. 21 UH L. Rev. 73 (1999).

Case Notes

Statute not unconstitutionally overbroad. 65 H. 116, 648
P.2d 190 (1982).

COMMENTARY ON §§707-750 AND 707-751

Act 214, Session Laws 1978, added these sections to prevent
the sexual exploitation of children. Dealing with activities involving the
participation of children without attempting to define the conduct in terms of
pornography, these sections classify the offenses as offenses against the
person rather than pornography. It is an offense for anyone to engage in the
proscribed activities whether the material or performance involving a minor is
pornographic or not. Senate Conference Committee Report No. 27-78, House
Conference Committee Report No. 21.

Act 218, Session Laws 1982, amended these sections to clarify
that the offense of promoting child abuse applies to the use of minors in
pornographic material. Section 707-751 was found to be unconstitutional
because "the statute prohibited speech protected by the First and
Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution ... and because the
statute did not incorporate the three-part test defining obscenity as
enunciated by the U.S. Supreme Court in the case of Miller v. California, the
statute prohibited non-obscene as well as obscene materials." The
constitutionality of the section is on appeal but the legislature found "that
any question as to what is being prohibited should be clarified." House
Conference Committee Report No. 4, Senate Conference Committee Report No. 3.

Act 91, Session Laws 1988, amended §707-750 by reclassifying
the offense of promoting child abuse in the first degree from a class B felony
to a class A felony. The legislature found that victims of child abuse are the
least able to defend themselves, and the resulting emotional scars of these
victims increase the likelihood of further contact with the criminal justice
system; therefore, a more severe punishment for this offense is warranted. The
legislature also found that reclassifying this offense will make the
classification consistent with the current penalty for sexual abuse in the
first degree involving a minor. House Standing Committee Report No. 481-88,
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2545.

Act 363, Session Laws 1997, amended §§707-750 and 707-751 to
include persons producing or making pornographic material involving minors
under the offense of child abuse. The legislature found that under existing
child abuse laws, in order for a person to be charged with child abuse, the
pornographic materials must show a minor engaged in or assisting others to
engage in a sexual act. This loophole in the law allowed persons producing
those materials to exploit children by using them in sexually explicit poses
without technically violating the law. The legislature believed that it was
important to extend the scope of the offense of child abuse to include
producing material in which children are exploited through sexually explicit
conduct.

The Act also, inter alia, amended the definition of "sexual
conduct" to include lascivious exhibition of the genital or pubic area of
a minor, and added the definitions of "lascivious" and "community
standards," in both §§707-750 and 707-751. Section 707-751 was also
amended to include possession of pornographic material involving children as an
offense. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 757, House Standing Committee
Report No. 1214.

Act 200, Session Laws 2002, amended §§707-750 and 707-751 by,
among other things, defining "child pornography" to encompass
computer-generated representations of minors. The legislature found that Act
200 addressed the problem of utilizing computer technology in committing crimes
against children. House Standing Committee Report No. 417-02, Conference
Committee Report No. 36-02.

Act 212, Session Laws 2012, amended §707-751 to
provide greater protection for children by addressing instances of possession
of particularly violent or egregious child pornography. Specifically, Act 212
amended the offense of promoting child abuse in the second degree to include
possession of thirty or more images of child pornography where the content of
at least one image contains a minor younger than the age of twelve,
sadomasochistic abuse of a minor, or bestiality involving a minor. The
legislature found that child pornography was a permanent record of the actual
sexual abuse, exploitation, and assault of innocent and helpless
children. The legislature further found that Hawaii's child pornography
laws should be strengthened and should distinguish between the various forms of
child pornography. Prior to Act 212, possession of any form of child
pornography was covered under the offense of promoting child abuse in the third
degree, but a violation was only a class C felony. Act 212 amended the
offense of promoting child abuse in the second degree, a class B felony, to
include particularly violent or egregious child pornography. Conference
Committee Report No. 24-12.

Act 16, Session Laws 2016, amended §§707-750 and 707-751 by
amending the definition of the term "sexual conduct" as that term is
used in the Penal Code for the offenses of promoting child abuse in the first
and second degrees. The amendments made by Act 16 aligned the term, as used in
state law, more closely with the terminology used in federal law by expanding
the definition of "sexual conduct" to include specific types of
conduct. Act 16 also removed unnecessary and archaic language regarding sexual
orientation. House Standing Committee Report No. 1124-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next